New York, session 2025-2026, S9582.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 707 of the surrogate's court 2 procedure act, as amended by chapter 486 of the laws of 2021, is amended 3 to read as follows: 4 2. Persons ineligible in court's discretion. The court may declare 5 ineligible to act as fiduciary[: 6 (a) a person unable to read and write the English language; or 7 (b)] an individual convicted of a felony whose crime may be adverse to 8 the welfare of the estate, including but not limited to, crimes such as 9 embezzlement or any crime where there was a misappropriation of money or 10 a breach of fiduciary duty. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13214-01-5